Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5211
Primary care, defined.

For purposes of the Primary Care Provider Act, primary care means family practice, general practice, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, general surgery, obstetrics/gynecology, and psychiatry.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 70;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 43.